Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Chapter 25 The Rhode Island Local Agriculture and Seafood Act

2-25-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “The Rhode Island Local Agriculture and Seafood Act.”

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-2.
Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares:

A viable agricultural and seafood sector in Rhode Island represents part of a secure regional food supply, which in turn lends itself to energy and economic efficiencies;

The federal government and regional entities have established and continue to establish programs and processes to support local agricultural production and increased consumption of locally produced food, and Rhode Island functions in whole or in part
in the context of federal and regional programs;

The general public is increasingly interested in locally produced food;

The benefits of local food systems to local communities include open land, jobs, nutritious and safe foods, and youth education opportunities;

Farms and commercial fishing are an integral part of Rhode Island’s overall economy;

Encouraging the continued growth of Rhode Island’s agricultural and seafood sectors is integral to reducing food insecurity in Rhode Island;

Relationship-based food systems such as farm-to-school programs, community supported agriculture (CSA) programs, farmers’ markets, and pick-your-own operations are increasingly popular and offer areas of opportunity for new farmers; and

The state of Rhode Island has historically established programs to provide for and regulate the agriculture and commercial fishing sectors.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-3.
Legislative intent.

The general assembly intends:

To support and develop more robust and self-sustaining agricultural and seafood sectors that also promotes emerging agricultural industries;

That policies and programs of the state will support and promote the Rhode Island agriculture and seafood industries as a vital component of the state’s economy and essential steward of our land and coastal waters;

That current policies and programs pertaining to the viability of Rhode Island’s agricultural and seafood industries be reviewed and confirmed or changed in order to assure the long-term economic prosperity of the industries; and

That Rhode Island will promote processing and consumption of agricultural and seafood products from within Rhode Island.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-4.
Definitions.

When used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management or his or her duly authorized agent or agents.

“Fund” means the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance fund.

“Program” means the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance program.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-5.
Small grants and technical assistance program established.

The department of environmental management shall establish the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance program. Through the program the department shall: (1) Assist in the marketing of Rhode Island grown agricultural products
and local seafood for the purpose of sale and promotion within the state of Rhode Island or United States; (2) Enhance the economic competitiveness of Rhode Island grown agricultural products and local seafood; (3) Provide financial
and technical assistance support to organizations and farmers for activities and programs which enhance the economic viability of local agriculture, and support the development of a locally based, safe and sustainable food system;
(4) Provide individual farm grants to small or beginning Rhode Island farmers that support the entry or sustainability within the respective industry; (5) Work with the state department of health to further develop and support food
safety related programs and standards pertaining to local agriculture and seafood; and (6) Perform other activities necessary to facilitate the success and viability of the state’s agricultural and seafood sectors.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-6.
Local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance fund established and solicitation of funding.

For the purpose of paying the costs to the department of environmental management of administering the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance program and for the purpose of carrying out the purposes of the program as stated
in subdivisions 2-25-5(3) and 2-25-5(4) a restricted receipt account is hereby created and known as the “local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance fund.”

The program shall be empowered to apply for and receive from any federal, state, or local agency, private foundation, or individual, any grants, appropriations, or gifts in order to carry out the purposes of the program established in §

2-25-5

.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-7.
Use of funds.

A non-profit entity or small or beginning farmer may apply to the department of environmental management for a grant to be used to fulfill the purposes of the program as stated in subdivisions 2-25-5(3) and 2-25-5(4). Any grant disbursed under this program
shall not exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per year. Applications for grants authorized under this section shall:

Provide a brief summary of the nonprofit entity or small or beginning farmer’s mission, goals, history, programs, and major accomplishments, success stories and qualifications;

Briefly describe the proposed project or program, the capacity to carry out the program and who will benefit from the program;

Describe the expected outcomes and the indicators of those outcomes;

Outline the timeline to be used in the implementation of the program or project; and

Provide a program or project budget.

The funds shall also be used by the department to provide administrative and technical support of the program, and to leverage program funds with other potential federal, state or nonprofit funding sources, and shall serve to develop, implement and enforce
when appropriate food safety related standards and programs related to local agriculture and seafood in coordination with the Rhode Island department of health and appropriate federal agencies.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-8.
Accountability and oversight.

On an annual basis, the department shall prepare a report that details the performance of the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance program, and the disbursements made during the prior year from the local agriculture and
seafood small grants and technical assistance fund and other sources, and how the department plans to allocate and use funds provided through the local agriculture and seafood small grants and technical assistance fund during the
next year. The report shall include any additional, relevant information relating to the administration of the program, and the status of any state-based agricultural assessments and local food production assessments.

The department shall annually schedule and conduct one or more public meetings to solicit input from the general public on whether the program is meeting its intended purposes, and to solicit recommendations for modifying the program.

The department shall annually submit the report, including an addendum summarizing the feedback provided at the public meeting(s) referenced in §

2-25-9

, to the general assembly.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.

2-25-9.
Powers and duties.

The department of environmental management may adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this section.

History of Section.
P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 1.